nl: Scherpstellingstype: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Andere
lt-LT: Fokusavimo tipas: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta ostrenja: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Drugo
ja: 焦点タイプ: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; その他
hu: Fókusz típusa: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Egyéb
da: Fokustype: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Andet
ro-RO: Tip focalizare: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Altele
pl: Typ ostrości: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Inne
es: Tipo de enfoque: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Otros
tr: Odak Türü: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Diğer
th: ประเภทโฟกัส: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип фокус: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Други
en: Focus type: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Other
vi: Loại tiêu cự: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de foco: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Outro
nb: Fokustype: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Annet
ru: Тип фокусировки: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Другой
el: Τύπος εστίασης: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Άλλο
it: Tipo di messa a fuoco: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de foco: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Outro
ko: 초점 유형: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; 기타
sv: Fokustyp: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Övrigt
zh-TW: 焦點類型: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; 其他
zh-CN: 焦点类型: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; 其他
de: Fokustyp: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Sonstiges
cs: Typ zaostření: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ zaostrenia: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Iné
fi: Tarkennustyyppi: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta izoštravanja: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Ostalo
fr: Type de focus: TTL; TTL iESP; TTL-CT-SIR; Autre